Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-998
Additional service
credits; accept payments and rollovers; limitations; how treated; tax consequences; direct transfer to retirement plan.

(1) The
retirement system may accept as payment for additional service credit that
is purchased pursuant to sections 79-990 to 79-992 an eligible rollover distribution
from or on behalf of the member who is making payments for such service credit
if the eligible rollover distribution does not exceed the amount of payment
required for the service credit being purchased by the member. The eligible
rollover distribution may be contributed to the retirement system by the member
or directly transferred from the plan that is making the eligible rollover
distribution on behalf of the member. Contribution by a member pursuant to
this section may only be made in the form of a cash contribution. For purposes
of this section, an eligible rollover distribution means all or any portion
of an amount that qualifies as an eligible rollover distribution under the
Internal Revenue Code from:

(a) A plan of another employer
which is qualified under section 401(a) or 403(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code;

(b) An annuity contract or
custodial account described in section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(c) An eligible deferred compensation
plan under section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code which is maintained
by a governmental employer described in section 457(e)(1)(A) of the Internal
Revenue Code; or

(d) An individual retirement
account or annuity described in section 408(a) or section 408(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code that is eligible to be rolled over to an employer plan under
the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) The
retirement system may accept as payment for service credit that is purchased
pursuant to sections 79-990 to 79-992 a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer
from an eligible deferred compensation plan as described in section 457(e)(17)
of the Internal Revenue Code on behalf of a member who is making payments
for such service credit if the amount transferred from the eligible deferred
compensation plan does not exceed the amount of payment required for the service
credit being purchased and the purchase of such service credit qualifies as
the purchase of permissive service credit by the member as defined in section
415(n)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) The
trustees may establish rules, regulations, and limitations on the eligible
rollover distributions and direct trustee-to-trustee transfers that may be
accepted by the retirement system pursuant to this section, including restrictions
on the type of assets that may be transferred to the retirement system.

(4) Cash
and other properties contributed or transferred to the system pursuant to
this section shall be deposited and held as a commingled asset of the system
and shall not be separately accounted for or invested for the member's benefit.
Contributions or direct transfers made by or on behalf of any member pursuant
to this section shall be treated as qualifying payments under sections 79-990
to 79-992 and as employee contributions for all other purposes of the Class
V School Employees Retirement Act except in determining federal and state
tax treatment of distributions from the system.

(5) The
system, the board, the trustees, and their respective members, officers, and
employees shall have no responsibility or liability with respect to the federal
and state income tax consequences of any contribution or transfer to the system
pursuant to this section, and the trustees may require as a condition to the
system's acceptance of any rollover contribution or transfer satisfactory
evidence that the proposed contribution or transfer is a qualifying rollover
contribution or trustee-to-trustee transfer under the Internal Revenue Code
and reasonable releases or indemnifications from the member against any and
all liabilities which may in any way be connected with such contribution or
transfer.

(6) Effective
January 1, 1993, any member who is to receive an eligible rollover distribution,
as defined in the Internal Revenue Code, from the system may, in accordance
with such rules, regulations, and limitations as may be established by the
trustees, elect to have such distribution made in the form of a direct transfer
to a retirement plan eligible to receive such transfer under the provisions
of the Internal Revenue Code. Any such election shall be made in the form
and within the time periods established by the trustees.

(7) A member's
surviving spouse or former spouse who is an alternate payee under a qualified
domestic relations order and, on or after September 1, 2010, any designated
beneficiary of a member who is not a surviving spouse or former spouse who
is entitled to receive an eligible rollover distribution from the system may,
in accordance with such rules, regulations, and limitations as may be established
by the trustees, elect to have such distribution made in the form of a direct
transfer to a retirement plan eligible to receive such transfer under the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

(8) An eligible rollover distribution on
behalf of a designated beneficiary of a member who is not a surviving spouse
or former spouse of the member may be transferred to an individual retirement
account or annuity described in section 408(a) or section 408(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code that is established for the purpose of receiving the distribution
on behalf of the designated beneficiary and that will be treated as an inherited
individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity described in
section 408(d)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(9) All
distributions from the system shall be subject to all withholdings required
by federal or state tax laws.

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 27;

Laws 1993, LB 107, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 76;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-1049.06;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 633;

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 711, § 12;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 47;

Laws 2012, LB916, § 25.